Utah statutes.
31A-26-307.   Claim reports to commissioner.

On the commissioner's request, any insurer or licensed adjuster connected with a loss or claim shall report to the commissioner all facts relative to the loss or claim arising under any insurance contract covering a subject of insurance that is resident, located, or to be performed in this state.

